District of Columbia statutes.
9-1207.02

Submarine cables at drawbridge openings.

Submarine cables may be used at drawbridge openings, provided previous approval shall have been obtained from the Department of the Army.

Mar. 27, 1934, 48 Stat. 506, ch. 97, § 2
1973 Ed., § 7-1231.
1981 Ed., § 7-1431.